Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
CHAPTER 12 Administrative Organization

12.010.
Definitions.

In this chapter, and throughout the Kentucky Revised Statutes where applicable and appropriate unless the context requires otherwise:

“Organizational unit” means any unit of organization in the executive branch of the state government that is not an administrative body, including but not limited to any agency, program cabinet, department, bureau, division, section or office;

“Department” means that basic unit of administrative organization of state government, by whatever name called, designated by statute or by statutorily authorized executive action as a “department,” such organization to be headed by a commissioner;

“Division” means a major subdivision of a department established by statute or by statutorily authorized administrative action, such to be headed by a director;

“Branch” means a small grouping of logical workforce personnel, such to be headed by a manager;

“Section” means a smaller grouping within a branch, such to be headed by a supervisor;

“Unit” means the smallest grouping of coordinated employees, such to be headed by a leader;

“Office” means a staff support or administrative function and shall be a major subdivision of a program cabinet only, such to be headed by an executive director;

“Administrative body” means any multi-member body in the executive branch of the state government, including but not limited to any board, council, commission, committee, authority or corporation, but does not include “branch,” “section,” “unit” or “office”;

“Program cabinet” means a group of departments, or departments and administrative bodies, designated by statute or statutorily authorized executive action as a “program cabinet.”

History.

4618-69: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 106, Art. I, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. I, § 4; 1982, ch. 393, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 447, § 1, effective April 12, 1982.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

This section was amended by two 1982 Acts which do not appear to be in conflict and have been compiled together.

12.015.
Administrative bodies to be included in department or program cabinet.

Unless specifically provided otherwise, each administrative body established by statute or statutorily authorized executive action shall be included for administrative purposes in an existing department or program cabinet. When an administrative body is established and the law establishing it does not specify the department or program cabinet within which the body is to be included, the Governor shall assign the body to an existing department or program cabinet in accordance with this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 106, Art. I, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. I, § 5; 1982, ch. 447, § 4, effective January 1, 1984.

12.020.
Enumeration of departments, program cabinets, and administrative bodies.

Departments, program cabinets and their departments, and the respective major administrative bodies that they include are enumerated in this section. It is not intended that this enumeration of administrative bodies be all-inclusive. Every authority, board, bureau, interstate compact, commission, committee, conference, council, office, or any other form of organization shall be included in or attached to the department or program cabinet in which they are included or to which they are attached by statute or statutorily authorized executive order; except in the case of the Personnel Board and where the attached department or administrative body is headed by a constitutionally elected officer, the attachment shall be solely for the purpose of dissemination of information and coordination of activities and shall not include any authority over the functions, personnel, funds, equipment, facilities, or records of the department or administrative body.

Cabinet for General Government-Departments headed by elected officers:

The Governor.

Lieutenant Governor.

Department of State.

Secretary of State.

Board of Elections.

Registry of Election Finance.

Department of Law.

Attorney General.

Department of the Treasury.

Treasurer.

Department of Agriculture.

Commissioner of Agriculture.

Agricultural Development Board.

Kentucky Agricultural Finance Corporation.

Auditor of Public Accounts.

Program cabinets headed by appointed officers:

Justice and Public Safety Cabinet:

Department of Kentucky State Police.

Office of Administrative Services.

Division of Operational Support.

Division of Management Services.

Office of Operations.

Division of West Troops.

Division of East Troops.

Division of Special Enforcement.

Division of Commercial Vehicle Enforcement.

Office of Technical Services.

Division of Forensic Sciences.

Division of Information Technology.

Department of Criminal Justice Training.

Department of Corrections.

Department of Juvenile Justice.

Office of the Secretary.

Office of Drug Control Policy.

Office of Legal Services.

Office of the Kentucky State Medical Examiner.

Parole Board.

Kentucky State Corrections Commission.

Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Services.

Office of Human Resource Management.

Division of Human Resource Administration.

Division of Employee Management.

Department of Public Advocacy.

Office of Communications.

Information Technology Services Division.

Office of Financial Management Services.

Division of Financial Management.

Grants Management Division.

Energy and Environment Cabinet:

Office of the Secretary.

Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Affairs.

Office of Legal Services.

Legal Division I.

Legal Division II.

Office of Administrative Hearings.

Office of Communication.

Mine Safety Review Commission.

Office of Kentucky Nature Preserves.

Kentucky Public Service Commission.

Department for Environmental Protection.

Office of the Commissioner.

Division for Air Quality.

Division of Water.

Division of Environmental Program Support.

Division of Waste Management.

Division of Enforcement.

Division of Compliance Assistance.

Department for Natural Resources.

Office of the Commissioner.

Division of Mine Permits.

Division of Mine Reclamation and Enforcement.

Division of Abandoned Mine Lands.

Division of Oil and Gas.

Division of Mine Safety.

Division of Forestry.

Division of Conservation.

Office of the Reclamation Guaranty Fund.

Office of Energy Policy.

Division of Energy Assistance.

Office of Administrative Services.

Division of Human Resources Management.

Division of Financial Management.

Division of Information Services.

Public Protection Cabinet.

Office of the Secretary.

Office of Communications and Public Outreach.

Office of Legal Services.

Insurance Legal Division.

Charitable Gaming Legal Division.

Alcoholic Beverage Control Legal Division.

Housing, Buildings and Construction Legal Division.

Financial Institutions Legal Division.

Professional Licensing Legal Division.

Office of Administrative Hearings.

Office of Administrative Services.

Division of Human Resources.

Division of Fiscal Responsibility.

Office of Claims and Appeals.

Board of Tax Appeals.

Board of Claims.

Crime Victims Compensation Board.

Kentucky Boxing and Wrestling Commission.

Kentucky Horse Racing Commission.

Office of Executive Director.

Division of Pari-mutuel Wagering and Compliance.

Division of Stewards.

Division of Licensing.

Division of Enforcement.

Division of Incentives and Development.

Division of Veterinary Services.

Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control.

Division of Distilled Spirits.

Division of Malt Beverages.

Division of Enforcement.

Department of Charitable Gaming.

Division of Licensing and Compliance.

Division of Enforcement.

Department of Financial Institutions.

Division of Depository Institutions.

Division of Non-Depository Institutions.

Division of Securities.

Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction.

Division of Fire Prevention.

Division of Plumbing.

Division of Heating, Ventilation, and Air Conditioning.

Division of Building Code Enforcement.

Department of Insurance.

Division of Health and Life Insurance and Managed Care.

Division of Property and Casualty Insurance.

Division of Administrative Services.

Division of Financial Standards and Examination.

Division of Licensing.

Division of Insurance Fraud Investigation.

Division of Consumer Protection.

Department of Professional Licensing.

Real Estate Authority.

Transportation Cabinet:

Department of Highways.

Office of Project Development.

Office of Project Delivery and Preservation.

Office of Highway Safety.

Highway District Offices One through Twelve.

Department of Vehicle Regulation.

Department of Aviation.

Department of Rural and Municipal Aid.

Office of Local Programs.

Office of Rural and Secondary Roads.

Office of the Secretary.

Office of Public Affairs.

Office for Civil Rights and Small Business Development.

Office of Budget and Fiscal Management.

Office of Inspector General.

Secretary’s Office of Safety.

Office of Support Services.

Office of Transportation Delivery.

Office of Audits.

Office of Human Resource Management.

Office of Information Technology.

Office of Legal Services.

Cabinet for Economic Development:

Office of the Secretary.

Office of Legal Services.

Department for Business Development.

Department for Financial Services.

Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority.

Finance and Personnel Division.

IT and Resource Management Division.

Compliance Division.

Incentive Administration Division.

Bluegrass State Skills Corporation.

Office of Marketing and Public Affairs.

Communications Division.

Graphics Design Division.

Office of Workforce, Community Development, and Research.

Office of Entrepreneurship and Small Business Innovation.

Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy.

Cabinet for Health and Family Services:

Office of the Secretary.

Office of the Ombudsman and Administrative Review.

Office of Public Affairs.

Office of Legal Services.

Office of Inspector General.

Office of Human Resource Management.

Office of Finance and Budget.

Office of Legislative and Regulatory Affairs.

Office of Administrative Services.

Office of Application Technology Services.

Office of Data Analytics.

Department for Public Health.

Department for Medicaid Services.

Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities.

Department for Aging and Independent Living.

Department for Community Based Services.

Department for Income Support.

Department for Family Resource Centers and Volunteer Services.

Office for Children with Special Health Care Needs.

Finance and Administration Cabinet:

Office of the Secretary.

Office of the Inspector General.

Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Affairs.

Office of General Counsel.

Office of the Controller.

Office of Administrative Services.

Office of Policy and Audit.

Department for Facilities and Support Services.

Department of Revenue.

Commonwealth Office of Technology.

State Property and Buildings Commission.

Office of Equal Employment Opportunity and Contract Compliance.

Kentucky Employees Retirement Systems.

Commonwealth Credit Union.

State Investment Commission.

Kentucky Housing Corporation.

Kentucky Local Correctional Facilities Construction Authority.

Kentucky Turnpike Authority.

Historic Properties Advisory Commission.

Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority.

Kentucky River Authority.

Kentucky Teachers’ Retirement System Board of Trustees.

Executive Branch Ethics Commission.

Office of Fleet Management.

Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet:

Kentucky Department of Tourism.

Division of Tourism Services.

Division of Marketing and Administration.

Division of Communications and Promotions.

Kentucky Department of Parks.

Division of Information Technology.

Division of Human Resources.

Division of Financial Operations.

Division of Purchasing.

Division of Facilities.

Division of Park Operations.

Division of Sales, Marketing, and Customer Service.

Division of Engagement.

Division of Food Services.

Division of Rangers.

Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources.

Division of Law Enforcement.

Division of Administrative Services.

Division of Engineering, Infrastructure, and Technology.

Division of Fisheries.

Division of Information and Education.

Division of Wildlife.

Division of Marketing.

Kentucky Horse Park.

Division of Support Services.

Division of Buildings and Grounds.

Division of Operational Services.

Kentucky State Fair Board.

Office of Administrative and Information Technology Services.

Office of Human Resources and Access Control.

Division of Expositions.

Division of Kentucky Exposition Center Operations.

Division of Kentucky International Convention Center.

Division of Public Relations and Media.

Division of Venue Services.

Division of Personnel Management and Staff Development.

Division of Sales.

Division of Security and Traffic Control.

Division of Information Technology.

Division of the Louisville Arena.

Division of Fiscal and Contract Management.

Division of Access Control.

Office of the Secretary.

Office of Finance.

Office of Government Relations and Administration.

Office of Legal Affairs.

Office of Human Resources.

Office of Public Affairs and Constituent Services.

Office of Arts and Cultural Heritage.

Kentucky African-American Heritage Commission.

Kentucky Foundation for the Arts.

Kentucky Humanities Council.

Kentucky Heritage Council.

Kentucky Arts Council.

Kentucky Historical Society.

Division of Museums.

Division of Oral History and Educational Outreach.

Division of Research and Publications.

Division of Administration.

Kentucky Center for the Arts.

Division of Governor’s School for the Arts.

Kentucky Artisans Center at Berea.

Northern Kentucky Convention Center.

Eastern Kentucky Exposition Center.

Personnel Cabinet:

Office of the Secretary.

Department of Human Resources Administration.

Office of Employee Relations.

Kentucky Public Employees Deferred Compensation Authority.

Office of Administrative Services.

Office of Legal Services.

Governmental Services Center.

Department of Employee Insurance.

Office of Diversity, Equality, and Training.

Office of Public Affairs.

Education and Labor Cabinet:

Office of the Secretary.

Office of Legal Services.

Workplace Standards Legal Division.

Workers’ Claims Legal Division.

Workforce Development Legal Division.

Office of Administrative Services.

Division of Human Resources Management.

Division of Fiscal Management.

Division of Operations and Support Services.

Office of Technology Services.

Division of Information Technology Services.

Office of Policy and Audit.

Office of Legislative Services.

Office of Communications.

Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics.

Board of the Kentucky Center for Statistics.

Early Childhood Advisory Council.

Governors’ Scholars Program.

Governor’s School for Entrepreneurs Program.

Foundation for Adult Education.

Department of Education.

Kentucky Board of Education.

Kentucky Technical Education Personnel Board.

Education Professional Standards Board.

Board of Directors for the Center for School Safety.

Department for Libraries and Archives.

Kentucky Environmental Education Council.

Kentucky Educational Television.

Kentucky Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing.

Department of Workforce Development.

Career Development Office.

Office of Vocational Rehabilitation.

Division of Kentucky Business Enterprise.

Division of the Carl D. Perkins Vocational Training Center.

Division of Blind Services.

Division of Field Services.

Statewide Council for Vocational Rehabilitation.

Employment First Council.

Office of Employer and Apprenticeship Services.

Division of Apprenticeship.

Kentucky Apprenticeship Council.

Division of Technical Assistance.

Office of Adult Education.

Office of the Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board.

Department of Workplace Standards.

Division of Occupational Safety and Health Compliance.

Division of Occupational Safety and Health Education and Training.

Division of Wages and Hours.

Office of Unemployment Insurance.

Kentucky Unemployment Insurance Commission.

Department of Workers’ Claims.

Division of Workers’ Compensation Funds.

Office of Administrative Law Judges.

Division of Claims Processing.

Division of Security and Compliance.

Division of Specialist and Medical Services.

Workers’ Compensation Board.

Workers’ Compensation Funding Commission.

Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board.

State Labor Relations Board.

Employers’ Mutual Insurance Authority.

Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Review Commission.

Workers’ Compensation Nominating Committee.

Office of Educational Programs.

Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board.

Kentucky Commission on Proprietary Education.

Kentucky Work Ready Skills Advisory Committee.

Kentucky Geographic Education Board.

Other departments headed by appointed officers:

Council on Postsecondary Education.

Department of Military Affairs.

Department for Local Government.

Kentucky Commission on Human Rights.

Kentucky Commission on Women.

Department of Veterans’ Affairs.

Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs.

Office of Minority Empowerment.

Governor’s Council on Wellness and Physical Activity.

Kentucky Communications Network Authority.

History.

42i-4, 165-45, 938q-3, 1496-2, 4618-70: amend. Acts 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. I, § 1; 1960, ch. 68, Art. I; 1962, ch. 106, Art. I, § 3; 1964, ch. 115, § 1; 1970, ch. 92, § 3; 1974, ch. 74, Art. I, § 6; 1976, ch. 62, § 6; 1976, ch. 299, § 1; 1976, ch. 326, § 1; 1978, ch. 117, § 15, effective July 1, 1978; 1978, ch. 155, §§ 2, 104, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 295, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 184, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 381, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 382, § 28, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 393, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 399, § 7, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 447, § 5, effective April 12, 1982; 1982, ch. 448, § 57, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 334, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 388, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 60, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 64, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 474, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 205, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 316, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 321, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 325, § 20, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 377, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 378, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 379, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 399, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 470, § 63, effective July 1, 1990; 1990, ch. 476, Pt. II, § 52, effective July 1, 1991; 1990, ch. 484, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 109, § 38, effective March 30, 1992; 1992, ch. 159, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 211, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 288, § 47, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 176, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 181, § 8, effective April 4, 1994; 1994, ch. 208, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 209, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 215, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 216, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 227, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 405, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 422, § 1, effective April 16, 1994; 1994, ch. 469, § 33, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 499, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 508, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 113, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 217, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 241, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 244, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 271, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 310, § 5, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 358, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 360, § 5, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 362, § 6, effective July 15, 1996; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 28, effective May 30, 1997; 1998, ch. 48, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 50, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 58, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 65, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 66, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 69, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 82, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 83, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 89, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 154, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 284, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 333, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 353, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 396, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 426, § 61, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 493, § 9, effective April 10, 1998; 1998, ch. 498, § 9, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 579, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 3, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 6, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 14, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 31, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 46, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 85, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 156, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 203, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 221, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 374, § 17, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 387, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 417, § 7, effective December 1, 2000; 2000, ch. 506, § 10, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 536, § 10, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 1, § 9, effective June 21, 2001; 2001, ch. 5, § 2, effective June 21, 2001; 2001, ch. 16, § 1, effective June 21, 2001; 2001, ch. 27, § 7, effective June 21, 2001; 2001, ch. 34, § 6, effective June 21, 2001; 2001, ch. 38, § 1, effective June 21, 2001; 2001, ch. 70, § 1, effective March 15, 2001; 2001, ch. 137, § 2, effective June 21, 2001; 2001, ch. 149, § 13, effective March 20, 2001; 2001, ch. 164, § 1, effective June 21, 2002; 2002, ch. 12, § 5, effective July 15, 2002; 2002, ch. 190, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2002, ch. 300, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2002, ch. 338, § 48, effective July 15, 2002; 2003, ch. 7, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2003, ch. 29, § 4, effective June 24, 2003; 2003, ch. 31, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2003, ch. 40, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2003, ch. 41, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2003, ch. 54, § 2, effective June 24, 2003; 2004, ch. 191, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 9, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 35, § 2, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 85, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 95, § 7, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 97, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 98, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 99, § 7, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 123, § 2, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 181, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 152, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 172, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 181, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 210, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 211, § 3, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 18, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2007, ch. 24, § 2, effective June 26, 2007; 2007, ch. 47, § 6, effective June 26, 2007; 2007, ch. 85, § 7, effective June 26, 2007; 2007 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 35, effective August 30, 2007; 2009, ch. 11, § 2, effective June 25, 2009; 2009, ch. 12, § 18, effective June 25, 2009; 2009, ch. 13, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; 2009, ch. 14, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; 2009, ch. 15, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; 2009, ch. 16, § 3, effective June 25, 2009; 2009, ch. 75, § 11, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, §
7, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 65, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 117, §
1, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 10, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 71, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 146, § 2, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 158, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; 2013, ch. 15, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2013, ch. 18, § 5, effective June 25, 2013; 2013, ch. 59, § 37, effective June 25, 2013; 2013, ch. 72, § 9, effective June 25, 2013; 2013, ch. 78, § 9, effective March 22, 2013; 2013, ch. 90, § 5, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 14, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2014, ch. 50, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2014, ch. 89, § 2, effective July 15, 2014; 2015 ch. 87, § 2, effective June 24, 2015; 2016 ch. 150, § 2, effective July 15, 2016; 2016 ch. 32, § 1, effective July 15, 2016; 2019 ch. 90, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2019 ch. 146, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2019 ch. 154, § 7, effective June 27, 2019; 2019 ch. 173, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 9, § 1, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 12, § 3, effective March 12, 2021; 2021 ch. 24, § 1, effective June 29, 2021; 2021 ch. 26, § 1, effective June 29, 2021; 2021 ch. 82, § 1, effective June 29, 2021; 2021 ch. 99, § 1, effective June 29, 2021; 2021 ch. 156, § 22, effective June 29, 2021; 2021 ch. 185, § 5, effective June 29, 2021; 2021 ch. 186, § 2, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 236, § 6, effective July 1, 2022; 2022 ch. 28, § 5, effective July 14, 2022; 2022 ch. 51, § 2, effective July 14, 2022; 2022 ch. 135, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

12.022.
Health and welfare agency — Administrator is agent to deal with federal government. [Repealed.]

12.023.
Organizational units and administrative bodies attached to the Governor’s office.

The following organizational units and administrative bodies shall be attached to the Office of the Governor:

Council on Postsecondary Education;

Department of Military Affairs;

Department for Local Government;

Kentucky Commission on Human Rights;

Kentucky Commission on Women;

Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs;

Office of Minority Empowerment;

The Martin Luther King Commission;

Office of Homeland Security; and

Kentucky Communications Network Authority.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. I, § 7; 1976, ch. 299, § 2; 1978, ch. 155, §§ 3, 104, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 295, § 3, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 393, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 447, § 6, effective April 12, 1982; 1984, ch. 334, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 331, § 8, effective July 15, 1986; 1996, ch. 113, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 29, effective May 30, 1997; 1998, ch. 69, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 239, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 353, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 466, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 2, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 387, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 461, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 506, § 11, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 530, § 15, effective April 26, 2000; 2000, ch. 536, § 11, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 137, § 3, effective June 21, 2001; 2004, ch. 41, § 7, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 9, § 2, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 35, § 3, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 85, § 2, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 95, § 8, effective June 20, 2005; ch. 99, § 8, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 172, § 3, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 193, § 12, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 211, § 4, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 47, § 7, effective June 26, 2007; 2007, ch. 85, § 8, effective June 26, 2007; 2007 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 36, effective August 30, 2007; 2009, ch. 16, § 4, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 8, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 117, § 15, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 71, § 2, effective July 12, 2012; 2013, ch. 15, § 2, effective June 25, 2013; 2013, ch. 57, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 89, § 2, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 146, § 2, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 12, § 2, effective March 12, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/12/2012). 2012 Ky. Acts ch. 158, sec. 84, instructs the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers affected by the Act, as it confirms the reorganization of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services within the executive branch, including the transfer of the Governor’s Council on Wellness and Physical Activity from the Office of the Governor to the Department for Public Health. Such a correction has been made in this statute.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 8, (1) at 1638.

12.025.
Governor’s reorganization powers — Personnel board exempt. [Repealed.]

12.027.
Temporary reorganization orders. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 106, Art. I, § 7; 1972, ch. 238, § 1; 1980, ch. 188, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 447, § 7, effective January 1, 1984; 1984, ch. 306, § 1, effective April 9, 1984; 1992, ch. 105, § 60, effective July 14, 1992; repealed by 2021 ch. 5, § 2, effective February 2, 2021.

12.028.
Governor and elected state executive officers to submit proposals for change to General Assembly — Reorganization plans — Legislative monitoring — Lapsed funds.

Recognizing the necessity for grouping related functions of organizational units and administrative bodies in order to promote greater economy, efficiency and improved administration, the Governor, the Kentucky Economic Development Partnership as created in KRS

154.10-010

, and other elected state executive officers may propose to the General Assembly, for its approval, changes in the state government organizational structure which may include the creation, alteration or abolition of any organizational unit or administrative body and the transfer of functions, personnel, funds, equipment, facilities, and records from one (1) organizational unit or administrative body to another.

Any reorganization proposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be set forth in a reorganization plan which shall be filed with the Legislative Research Commission. The plan shall include:

An explanation of each proposed change, including the need for the change;

An estimate of any reduction or increase in expenditures, itemized as far as practicable, which the promulgating officer expects will result from the reorganization;

A description of any improvements in the management, delivery of state services, and efficiency of state government operations which the promulgating officer expects will be realized as a result of the reorganization; and

Specification of the effects of the reorganization on the budget and personnel of each affected organizational unit or administrative body, including but not limited to the amount of funds and the number of employees that will be transferred from one (1) organizational unit or administrative body to another, any reductions in the state workforce resulting from the reorganization, and the methods to be utilized to achieve such reductions.

The Legislative Research Commission or the Legislative Oversight and Investigations Committee may monitor the implementation of any reorganization plan to determine the extent to which the anticipated improvements in economy, efficiency, or administration have been realized as a result of the reorganization and shall report its findings to the General Assembly.

Funds transferred due to reorganization shall be maintained in separately designated accounts. Any excess funds resulting from a reorganization shall lapse to the general fund surplus account.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 447, § 2, effective January 1, 1984; 1984, ch. 306, § 2, effective April 9, 1984; 1992, ch. 105, § 61, effective July 14, 1992; 2021 ch. 5, § 1, effective February 2, 2021; 2021 ch. 14, § 9, effective March 12, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(3/12/2021). This statute was amended by 2021 Ky. Acts chs. 5 and 14, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

12.029.
Governor’s advisory committee on reorganization.

The Governor may appoint advisory or study committees to assist and recommend to him on problems concerning the various functions, organizational units and administrative bodies of state government. Members of such committees shall serve without pay, but shall be reimbursed for necessary and actual expenses.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 447, § 3, effective January 1, 1984.

12.030.
Distribution of work within agency or department. [Repealed.]

12.031.
Inclusion of osteopaths within references to physicians in executive orders.

Any reference in an executive order to “medical doctor,” “M.D.,” or “physician” shall be deemed to include a doctor of osteopathy or D.O., unless either of those terms is specifically excluded.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 413, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

12.035.
Agency administrators. [Repealed.]

12.040.
Heads of departments — Appointment of executive directors by Governor.

The heads of departments shall have direction and control of their respective departments, and through their departments shall exercise the powers and perform the duties vested in the departments under their direction and control. Except as otherwise expressly provided by law, the heads of departments shall be appointed by the Governor for terms not exceeding four (4) years on the basis of their merit and fitness to perform the duties of their respective offices.

Each department head shall maintain a pattern of organization capable of receiving the attachment of administrative bodies that have functions related to the general function of his department.

Within the resources of his department, each department head shall provide administrative bodies in his department with such facilities and services as will enable those bodies to carry out the functions with which they are charged.

The heads of all departments shall exercise supervision over the personnel and financial records of their respective departments.

In case of a vacancy or in the absence or disability of the head of a department, the Governor may authorize the head of a division or other administrative officer to act as head of the department.

When required by statute to appoint the head of an office, the Governor shall appoint an executive director for a term not exceeding four (4) years on the basis of merit and fitness to perform the duties of the office.

History.

4618-152, 4618-153: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 27, § 18; 1950, ch. 123, § 29; 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. I, § 2; 1962, ch. 106, Art. I, § 8; 2009, ch. 13, § 2, effective June 25, 2009.

12.050.
Deputy heads of departments and directors of divisions and institutions.

Unless otherwise provided by law, deputy heads of departments, and directors of divisions and institutions shall be appointed by the heads of the departments and in statutory departments the appointment of deputy heads of departments, and heads of divisions shall be with the prior written approval of the Governor. In departments each division head shall report to the head of the department to which the division is assigned.

History.

4618-154, 4618-155: amend. Acts 1948, ch. 228; 1950, ch. 123, § 29; 1974, ch. 74, Art. I, § 13; 1982, ch. 393, § 6, effective July 15, 1982.

12.060.
Department staffs.

The heads of statutory departments, with the approval of the secretary of personnel, may establish such subordinate positions as may be necessary and make appointments thereto, within the limitations of their appropriations, and removals therefrom. All appointees to such positions shall be under the supervision, direction, and control of the heads of the respective departments and shall perform such duties as the heads of the departments prescribe. The appointment of all employees not otherwise provided for shall be made by the heads of the departments.

The head of any department, with the approval of the secretary of personnel, may abolish unnecessary offices and positions, transfer officers and employees between positions, and change the duties, titles and compensation of existing offices and positions, subject to any provision of law in relation thereto.

History.

4618-150, 4618-155: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 393, § 7, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 487, § 7, effective July 15, 1998.

12.070.
Appointments to boards and commissions — Minority representation — Reimbursement for expenses when compensation not provided.

For the purpose of this section, “minority” means American Indian; Alaskan native; African-American; Hispanic, including persons of Mexican, Puerto Rican, Cuban, and Central or South American origin; Pacific islander; or other ethnic group underrepresented on state boards and commissions.

Except as otherwise expressly provided by law, the members of each administrative board or commission shall be citizens of Kentucky appointed by the Governor from the state at large on the basis of their interests in public affairs, their good judgment, and their knowledge and ability in the field of action of the department for which appointed, with a view to providing diversity of interests and points of view in the membership and without regard to their political or religious opinions or affiliations.

Where appointments to administrative boards and commissions are made from lists submitted to him, the Governor may reject the list and require that other lists be submitted. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, in the event the current membership of a board or commission reflects a proportion of the minority group less than the proportion of the minority group in the total population of the Commonwealth, then the Governor may appoint a member of the minority group even if the list of nominees for a vacancy does not include a member of the minority group.

Before entering upon the duties of their office, all members of administrative boards and commissions shall take the oath of office prescribed by Section 228 of the Constitution.

When a board, commission, or similar administrative body is established and no provision is made for compensation of members, members shall serve without pay, but may receive reimbursement for their actual and necessary expenses.

History.

4618-120, 4618-156: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 106, Art. I, § 10; 1994, ch. 359, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

Acts, 1976, ch. 206, sec. 1, provides: “Appointments of citizen at large members of boards and commissions covered by Acts 1976, ch. 206, shall be made when a vacancy occurs upon the board or commission. The governor may, in cases where he deems necessary, delay making a citizen at large appointment until a second vacancy occurs on the board or commission or a second vacancy occurs in a particular category of membership, but in no case shall he delay beyond a second vacancy the making of such appointments.”